Utah statutes.
63M-1-2911.   Reports of tax credits.

(1)  Before December 1 of each year, the office shall submit a report to the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget, the Office of Legislative Fiscal Analyst, and the Division of Finance identifying:

(a)  the total amount listed on tax credit certificates the office issues under this part; and

(b)  the criteria that the office uses in prioritizing the issuance of tax credits amongst tax credit applicants.

(2)  By the first business day of each month, the office shall submit a report to the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget, the Office of Legislative Fiscal Analyst, and the Division of Finance identifying:

(a)  each new agreement entered into by the office since the last report;

(b)  the total amount listed on tax credit certificates the office issues under this part; and

(c)  the criteria that the office uses in prioritizing the issuance of tax credits amongst tax credit applicants.



Enacted by Chapter 306, 2011 General Session

